Maryland, session 2025, SB0954.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0954*

SENATE BILL 954
(Three–fifths of all the members elected to each of the two Houses concurring), That it be
proposed that the Maryland Constitution read as follows:
Article IV – Judiciary Department
[3.
Except for the Judges of the District Court, the Judges of the several Courts other
than the Supreme Court of Maryland or any intermediate courts of appeal shall, subject to
the provisions of Section 5 of this Article of the Constitution, be elected in Baltimore City
and in each county, by the qualified voters of the city and of each county, respectively, all
of the said Judges to be elected at the general election to be held on the Tuesday after the
first Monday in November, as now provided for in the Constitution. Each of the said Judges
shall hold the office for the term of fifteen years from the time of the election, and until the
Judge’s successor is elected and qualified, or until the Judge shall have attained the age of
seventy years, whichever may first happen, and be reeligible thereto until the Judge shall
have attained the age of seventy years, and not after. In case of the inability of any of said
Judges to discharge the Judge’s duties with efficiency, by reason of continued sickness, or
of physical or mental infirmity, it shall be in the power of the General Assembly, two–thirds
of the members of each House concurring, with the approval of the Governor to retire said
Judge from office.]
3.
(A) ON THE OCCURRENCE OF A VACANCY IN THE OFFICE OF A JUDGE OF A
CIRCUIT COURT, WHETHER BY DEATH, RESIGNATION, REMOVAL, RETIREMENT,
DISQUALIFICATION BY REASON OF AGE, REJECTION BY THE VOTERS OF AN
INCUMBENT, THE CREATION OF THE OFFICE OF A JUDGE, OR OTHERWISE, THE
GOVERNOR, BY AND WITH THE ADVICE AND CONSENT OF THE SENATE, SHALL
APPOINT AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS QUALIFIED TO FILL THE OFFICE.
(B) (1) CONFIRMATION BY THE SENATE SHALL BE MADE ON A MAJORITY
VOTE OF ALL MEMBERS OF THE SENATE.
(2) AN INDIVIDUAL APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR MAY NOT
EXERCISE THE DUTIES OF A JUDGE OF A CIRCUIT COURT UNLESS CONFIRMED BY
THE SENATE.
(3) IF A VACANCY IN THE OFFICE OF JUDGE OF A CIRCUIT COURT
OCCURS DURING THE RECESS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, THE GOVERNOR MAY
CONVENE THE SENATE ALONE FOR THE PURPOSE OF CONFIRMING AN
APPOINTMENT.
(C) (1) A CIRCUIT COURT JUDGE APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR AND
CONFIRMED BY THE SENATE MAY TAKE OFFICE BY TAKING THE PRESCRIBED OATH

SENATE BILL 954 3
OF OFFICE WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER CONFIRMATION.
(2) IF A CIRCUIT COURT JUDGE APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR AND
CONFIRMED BY THE SENATE FAILS TO TAKE OFFICE WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER
CONFIRMATION, THE OFFICE SHALL BE DEEMED VACANT.
(D) A CIRCUIT COURT JUDGE APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR AND
CONFIRMED BY THE SENATE BY A VOTE OF AT LEAST 80% OF ALL MEMBERS OF THE
SENATE AND WHO TAKES OFFICE WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER CONFIRMATION SHALL
HOLD THE OFFICE FOR A TERM OF 15 YEARS FROM THE DATE THAT THE JUDGE TOOK
OFFICE AND UNTIL THE JUDGE’S SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED OR ELECTED, AS
APPLICABLE, AND QUALIFIED, OR UNTIL THE JUDGE ATTAINS THE AGE OF 70 YEARS,
WHICHEVER OCCURS FIRST.
(E) (1) IF A CIRCUIT COURT JUDGE WHO WAS CONFIRMED BY THE
SENATE BY A VOTE OF AT LEAST A MAJORITY BUT LESS THAN 80% OF ALL MEMBERS
OF THE SENATE TAKES OFFICE FOLLOWING CONFIRMATION BY THE SENATE, THE
CONTINUANCE IN OFFICE OF THE JUDGE IS SUBJECT TO APPROVAL OR REJECTION
BY THE REGISTERED VOTERS OF THE CITY OR COUNTY FROM WHICH THE JUDGE WAS
APPOINTED AT THE NEXT GENERAL ELECTION FOLLOWING THE EXPIRATION OF 1
YEAR FROM THE DATE THAT THE JUDGE TOOK OFFICE.
(2) (I) THE APPROVAL OR REJECTION OF THE JUDGE BY THE
REGISTERED VOTERS SHALL BE BY CONTESTED ELECTION IN WHICH OTHER
CANDIDATES WHO ARE QUALIFIED FOR THE OFFICE OF CIRCUIT COURT JUDGE MAY
FILE AS CANDIDATES.
(II) 1. A CANDIDATE IS CONSIDERED QUALIFIED IF THE
CANDIDATE HAS APPLIED TO THE APPROPRIATE JUDICIAL NOMINATING
COMMISSION AND THE COMMISSION FORWARDS THE NAME OF THE CANDIDATE TO
THE GOVERNOR AS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS FULLY PROFESSIONALLY QUALIFIED FOR
THE OFFICE OF CIRCUIT COURT JUDGE.
2. A CANDIDATE WHOSE NAME IS FORWARDED TO THE
GOVERNOR IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH
SHALL BE CONSIDERED QUALIFIED INDEFINITELY, UNLESS THE JUDICIAL
NOMINATING COMMISSION ALERTS THE GOVERNOR THAT IT NO LONGER
CONSIDERS THE CANDIDATE QUALIFIED.
(3) THE CANDIDATE WHO WINS ELECTION IN THE GENERAL
ELECTION SHALL SERVE FOR A TERM OF 15 YEARS FROM THE DATE THAT THE JUDGE
TAKES OFFICE AND UNTIL THE JUDGE’S SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED OR ELECTED, AS
APPLICABLE, AND QUALIFIED, OR UNTIL THE JUDGE ATTAINS THE AGE OF 70 YEARS,

SENATE BILL 954
WHICHEVER OCCURS FIRST.
(F) (1) IF THE 15–YEAR TERM OF A CIRCUIT COURT JUDGE EXPIRES
BEFORE THE JUDGE ATTAINS THE AGE OF 70 YEARS, THAT JUDGE MAY BE
REAPPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR FOR ANOTHER 15–YEAR TERM, OR UNTIL THE
JUDGE ATTAINS THE AGE OF 70 YEARS, WHICHEVER OCCURS FIRST.
(2) THE REAPPOINTMENT OF A CIRCUIT COURT JUDGE UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION IS NOT SUBJECT TO CONFIRMATION BY THE SENATE.
[5.
Upon every occurrence or recurrence of a vacancy through death, resignation,
removal, disqualification by reason of age or otherwise, or expiration of the term of fifteen
years of any judge of a circuit court, or creation of the office of any such judge, or in any
other way, the Governor shall appoint a person duly qualified to fill said office, who shall
hold the same until the election and qualification of his successor. His successor shall be
elected at the first biennial general election for Representatives in Congress after the
expiration of the term of fifteen years (if the vacancy occurred in that way) or the first such
general election after one year after the occurrence of the vacancy in any other way than
through expiration of such term. Except in case of reappointment of a judge upon expiration
of his term of fifteen years, no person shall be appointed who will become disqualified by
reason of age and thereby unable to continue to hold office until the prescribed time when
his successor would have been elected.]
[5A.] 5.
(a) A vacancy in the office of a justice or judge of an appellate court, whether
occasioned by the death, resignation, removal, retirement, disqualification by reason of age,
or rejection by the voters of an incumbent, the creation of the office of a justice or judge, or
otherwise, shall be filled as provided in this section.
(b) Upon the occurrence of a vacancy the Governor shall appoint, by and with the
advice and consent of the Senate, a person duly qualified to fill said office who shall hold
the same until the election for continuance in office as provided in subsections (c) and (d).
(c) The continuance in office of a justice of the Supreme Court of Maryland is
subject to approval or rejection by the registered voters of the appellate judicial circuit from
which the justice was appointed at the next general election following the expiration of
[one] 1 year from the date of the occurrence of the vacancy which the justice was appointed
to fill, and at the general election next occurring every [ten] 10 years thereafter.
(d) The continuance in office of a judge of the Appellate Court of Maryland is
subject to approval or rejection by the registered voters of the geographical area prescribed
by law at the next general election following the expiration of [one] 1 year from the date of
the occurrence of the vacancy which the judge was appointed to fill, and at the general

SENATE BILL 954 5
election next occurring every [ten] 10 years thereafter.
(e) (1) The approval or rejection by the registered voters of a justice or judge
as provided for in subsections (c) and (d) shall be a vote for the justice’s or judge’s retention
in office for a term of [ten] 10 years or the justice’s or judge’s removal.
(2) The justice’s or judge’s name shall be on the appropriate ballot, without
opposition, and the voters shall vote yes or no for the justice’s or judge’s retention in office.
If the voters reject the retention in office of a justice or judge, or if the vote is tied, the office
becomes vacant [ten] 10 days after certification of the election returns.
(f) An appellate court justice or judge shall retire when the justice or judge
attains the justice’s or judge’s [seventieth] 70TH birthday.
(g) A member of the General Assembly who is otherwise qualified for
appointment to judicial office is not disqualified by reason of the member’s membership in
a General Assembly which proposed or enacted any constitutional amendment or statute
affecting the method of selection, continuance in office, or retirement or removal of a justice
or judge, the creation or abolition of a court, an increase or decrease in the number of
justices or judges of any court, or an increase or decrease in the salary, pension, or other
allowances of any justice or judge.
41D.
(A) The Governor, by and with the advice and consent of the Senate, shall appoint
each judge of the District Court whenever for any reason a vacancy [shall exist] EXISTS in
the office.
(B) All hearings, deliberations, and debate on the confirmation of appointees of
the Governor shall be public, and no hearings, deliberations, or debate [thereon] shall be
conducted by the Senate or any committee or subcommittee [thereof] OF THE SENATE in
secret or executive session.
(C) (1) Confirmation by the Senate shall be made [upon] ON a majority vote of
all members of the Senate.
(2) A judge appointed by the Governor [may take office upon qualification
and] MAY NOT EXERCISE THE DUTIES OF A JUDGE OF THE DISTRICT COURT before
confirmation by the Senate[, but shall cease to hold office at the close of the regular annual
session of the General Assembly next following his appointment or during which he shall
have been appointed by the Governor, if the Senate shall not have confirmed his
appointment before then].
(3) IF A VACANCY IN THE OFFICE OF JUDGE OF THE DISTRICT COURT
OCCURS DURING THE RECESS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, THE GOVERNOR MAY

SENATE BILL 954
CONVENE THE SENATE ALONE FOR THE PURPOSE OF CONFIRMING AN
APPOINTMENT.
(D) Each judge appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the Senate shall hold
the office for a term of [ten] 10 years or until [he shall have attained] THE JUDGE ATTAINS
the age of [seventy] 70 years whichever may first occur.
(E) If the [ten year] 10–YEAR term of a judge [shall expire] EXPIRES before that
judge [shall have attained] ATTAINS the age of [seventy] 70 years, that judge shall be
reappointed by the Governor, with the Senate’s consent, for another [ten year] 10–YEAR
term or until [he shall have attained] THE JUDGE ATTAINS the age of [seventy] 70 years,
whichever [may first occur] OCCURS FIRST. [To the extent inconsistent herewith, the
provisions of Sections 3 and 5 of this Article shall not apply to judges of the District Court.]
Article XVIII – Provisions of Limited Duration
6.
(A) FOR THE PURPOSE OF IMPLEMENTING THE AMENDMENTS TO ARTICLE
IV OF THIS CONSTITUTION PROPOSED BY SENATE BILL 954 OF 2025 CONCERNING
THE SELECTION AND TENURE OF CIRCUIT COURT JUDGES, THE FOLLOWING
PROVISIONS SHALL GOVERN. IN ACCORDANCE WITH ARTICLE XIV, SECTION 1A OF
THIS CONSTITUTION, THIS SECTION SHALL EXPIRE WHEN ALL THE JUDGES OF THE
CIRCUIT COURTS HAVE COMPLETED ALL THE TERMS FOR WHICH THE JUDGES ARE
RETAINED IN OFFICE UNDER SUBSECTIONS (B) AND (C) OF THIS SECTION OR HAVE
VACATED THEIR OFFICES FOR ANY REASON.
(B) EACH JUDGE OF A CIRCUIT COURT WHO IS IN OFFICE FOR AN ELECTED
TERM ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THESE AMENDMENTS, UNLESS THE JUDGE DIES,
RESIGNS, RETIRES, OR IS OTHERWISE LAWFULLY REMOVED, SHALL CONTINUE IN
OFFICE UNTIL THE JUDGE’S SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED OR ELECTED, AS
APPLICABLE, AND QUALIFIED OR UNTIL THE JUDGE ATTAINS THE AGE OF 70 YEARS,
WHICHEVER OCCURS FIRST. CONTINUANCE OF THE JUDGE IN OFFICE IS THEN
SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF ARTICLE IV, SECTION 3 OF THIS CONSTITUTION,
BUT IN NO EVENT SHALL ANY JUDGE CONTINUE IN OFFICE AFTER ATTAINING THE
AGE OF 70 YEARS.
(C) EACH JUDGE OF A CIRCUIT COURT WHO IS IN OFFICE ON THE EFFECTIVE
DATE OF THE AMENDMENTS TO ARTICLE IV OF THIS CONSTITUTION PROPOSED BY
SENATE BILL 954 OF 2025, BUT WHO HAS NOT BEEN ELECTED TO THAT OFFICE BY
THE VOTERS, SHALL CONTINUE TO BE GOVERNED BY ARTICLE IV, SECTIONS 3 AND
5 OF THIS CONSTITUTION, AS IN EFFECT BEFORE THE RATIFICATION OF THE
AMENDMENTS TO ARTICLE IV OF THIS CONSTITUTION PROPOSED BY SENATE BILL
954 OF 2025. IF THE JUDGE IS ELECTED TO THE OFFICE, THE JUDGE SHALL

SENATE BILL 954 7
CONTINUE IN OFFICE UNTIL THE JUDGE’S SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED OR ELECTED,
AS APPLICABLE, AND QUALIFIED OR UNTIL THE JUDGE ATTAINS THE AGE OF 70
YEARS, WHICHEVER OCCURS FIRST. CONTINUANCE OF THE JUDGE IN OFFICE AT THE
END OF THE ELECTED TERM IS THEN SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF ARTICLE IV,
SECTION 3 OF THIS CONSTITUTION, BUT IN NO EVENT SHALL ANY JUDGE CONTINUE
IN OFFICE AFTER ATTAINING THE AGE OF 70 YEARS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the General Assembly
determines that the amendment to the Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this
Act affects multiple jurisdictions and that the provisions of Article XIV, § 1 of the Maryland
Constitution concerning local approval of constitutional amendments do not apply.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the amendment to the
Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this Act shall be submitted to the qualified
voters of the State at the next general election to be held in November 2026 for adoption or
rejection in accordance with Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution. At that general
election, the vote on the proposed amendment to the Constitution shall be by ballot, and on
each ballot there shall be printed the words “For the Constitutional Amendment” and
“Against the Constitutional Amendment”, as now provided by law. Immediately after the
election, all returns shall be made to the Governor of the vote for and against the proposed
amendment, as directed by Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution, and further
proceedings had in accordance with Article XIV.